src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Oïr
+V+Inf:oïr # ;
+V+Inf:odir # ;
+V:oi PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past:oï # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:oi # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:oz # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:ot # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:oit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:oons # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:oions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:oez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:oiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:oent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:oient # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:oï # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:oïs # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:oï%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:oïmes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:oïstes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:oïrent # ;

! Verify all
+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:oueie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:oueies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:oueit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:ouiiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:ouiiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:oueient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:orrai # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind:orai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:orras # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:oras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:orra%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:ora%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:orrons # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:orons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:orrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:orez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:orreiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:oreiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:orront # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:oront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:oie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:oies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:oit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:oiiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:oiiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:oient # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:oïsse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:oïsses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:oïsst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:oïssons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:oïssiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:oïssez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:oïssiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:oïsseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:oïssent # ;

! Conditionals unknown
!+V+1s+Pres+Cond:ereie # ;
!+V+2s+Pres+Cond:ereis # ;
!+V+3s+Pres+Cond:ereit # ;
!+V+1p+Pres+Cond:eriiens # ;
!+V+2p+Pres+Cond:eriiez # ;
!+V+3p+Pres+Cond:ereient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:o # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Imp:oz # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:oions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:oi # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:oiez # ;

LEXICON Lire
+V+Inf:lire # ;
+V:lis PresPart ;
!+V+Part+Pres:lisant # ;
+V+Part+Past:leü # ;
+V+Part+Past:li%{T%} # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:li # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:lis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:lit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:lisons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:lisiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:lisent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:lui # ;
+V+1s+SPast+Ind:lis # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:leüs # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:lesis # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:lut # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:list # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:leümes # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:lesimes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:leüstes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:lesistes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:lurent # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:lestrent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:liseie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:liseies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:liseit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:lisiiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:lisons # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:lisiiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:liseient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:lirai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:liras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:lira%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:lirons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:lirez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:lireiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:liront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:lise # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:lises # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:list # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:lisiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:lisiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:lisent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:leüsse # ;
+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:lesisse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:leüsses # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:lesisses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:leüst # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:lesist # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:leüssons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:lesissons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:leüssiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:lesissiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:leüssez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:lesissez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:leüssiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:lesissiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:leüsseiz # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:lesisseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:leüssent # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:lesissent # ;

! Verify
+V+1s+Pres+Cond:lireie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:lireis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:lireit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:liriiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:liriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:lireient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:lis # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:lisons # ; ! Verify
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:lisez # ; ! Verify

!!€gt-norm: -er_verbs
!!€ durer:      durer+V+Inf
!!€ dur:        durer+V+1s+Pres+Ind
!!€ durat:       durer+V+3s+SPast+Ind
!!€ dura:       durer+V+3s+SPast+Ind
!!€ durerons:   durer+V+1p+Fut+Ind
!!€ dure:    durer+V+2s+Pres+Imp
